Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.625.100

Board of directors of a school district may establish.

The board of directors of any school district may establish and maintain an employee suggestion program to encourage and reward meritorious suggestions by certificated and classified school employees. The program shall be designed to promote efficiency or economy in the performance of any function of the school district. Each board establishing an employee suggestion program shall establish procedures for the proper administration of the program.

[ 1986 c 143 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.02.320.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1986 c 143: "This act shall take effect on August 1, 1986." [ 1986 c 143 s 4.]